Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.534

Dentist health program—Content—License surcharge. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

(1) To implement a dentist health program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the commission shall enter into a contract with a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program. The dentist health program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired dentists to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired dentists including those ordered by the commission;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired dentists; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the commission.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of up to fifty dollars per year or equivalent on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department of health from every dentist licensed under this chapter. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the dentist health program.

[ 2022 c 43 s 2; 2013 c 129 s 1; 1999 c 179 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 220; 1991 c 3 s 72; 1989 c 125 s 1.]

PDFRCW 18.32.534

Dentist health program—Content—License surcharge. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) To implement a dentist health program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the commission shall enter into a contract with a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program. The dentist health program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired dentists to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired dentists including those ordered by the commission;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired dentists; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the commission.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of up to $70 per year or equivalent on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department of health from every dentist licensed under this chapter. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the dentist health program.

[ 2024 c 15 s 6; 2022 c 43 s 2; 2013 c 129 s 1; 1999 c 179 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 220; 1991 c 3 s 72; 1989 c 125 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 15 s 6: "Section 6 of this act takes effect January 1, 2026." [ 2024 c 15 s 8.]

Findings—2024 c 15: See note following RCW 18.71.310.